Arkansas, session 2025, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 86, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-86-315. State examination for licensure.
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall administer a state examination
for licensure as a massage therapist that shall be administered at the time
and place designated by the department.
(2) The state examination under this section is an additional
option to licensure in this state and does not replace or negate a national
examination.
(3) The state examination under this section shall be offered as
an optional pathway to licensure and shall only be offered to unlicensed
graduates of an approved massage therapy school or students enrolled in a
massage therapy apprenticeship program in this state who have completed the
educational requirements under § 17-86-306(e).
(b)(1) The state examination shall be a one hundred (100) question
examination and be proportionate to educational requirements and classroom
hours based on the Massage Therapy Act, § 17-86-101 et seq.
(2) The state examination shall include:
*JMB278*
04-09-2025 11:25:21 JMB278

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB168
(A) Nine (9) questions concerning anatomy and physiology;
(B) Nine (9) questions concerning kinesiology;
(C) Twenty (20) questions concerning pathology,
contraindications, and special populations;
(D) Forty-five (45) questions concerning massage
techniques;
(E) Five (5) questions concerning hydrotherapy,
electrotherapy, and heliotherapy;
(F) Five (5) questions concerning hygiene and infection
control; and
(G) Seven (7) questions concerning massage therapy law,
business management, and personal ethics.
(c) A passing grade of seventy percent (70%) on the state examination
is required for licensure.
(d) The state examination shall not be computer adaptive.
(e)(1) The department may require massage therapy instructors who
currently provide instruction in an approved massage therapy school in this
state or a massage therapy apprenticeship program in this state to submit
examination questions for the state examination.
(2) An examination question submitted by a massage therapy
instructor shall:
(A)(i) Be derived from a textbook that the massage therapy
instructor is currently utilizing to provide instruction to massage therapy
students under subdivision (e) of this section.
(ii) Material from the Massage and Bodywork
Licensing Examination shall not be considered a textbook under this section;
and
(B) Include:
(i) The title of the textbook;
(ii) The author of the textbook;
(iii) The edition of the textbook;
(iv) The page number and line number from which the
examination question was derived or obtained; and
(v) The date when the examination question was
created.

04-09-2025 11:25:21 JMB278

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB168

/s/Rice


































04-09-2025 11:25:21 JMB278